Hawaii statutes.
§269-33 Public utilities commission special
fund. (a) There is established in the state treasury a public utilities
commission special fund to be administered by the public utilities commission.
The proceeds of the fund shall be used by the public utilities commission and
the division of consumer advocacy of the department of commerce and consumer
affairs for all expenses incurred in the administration of chapters 269, 271,
271G, 269E, and 486J, and for costs incurred by the department of commerce and consumer
affairs to fulfill the department's limited oversight and administrative
support functions; provided that the expenditures of the public utilities
commission shall be in accordance with legislative appropriations. On a
quarterly basis, an amount not exceeding thirty per cent of the proceeds
remaining in the fund after the deduction for central service expenses,
pursuant to section 36-27, shall be allocated by the public utilities
commission to the division of consumer advocacy and deposited in the compliance
resolution fund established pursuant to section 26-9(o); provided that all
moneys allocated by the public utilities commission from the fund to the
division of consumer advocacy shall be in accordance with legislative
appropriations.

(b) All moneys appropriated to, received, and
collected by the public utilities commission that are not otherwise pledged,
obligated, or required by law to be placed in any other special fund or
expended for any other purpose shall be deposited into the public utilities
commission special fund including, but not limited to, all moneys received and
collected by the public utilities commission pursuant to sections 92-21,
269-28, 269-30, 271-27, 271-36, 271G-19, 269E-6, 269E-14, and 607-5.

(c) The public utilities commission shall
submit an update as part of its annual report submitted pursuant to section
269-5 detailing all funds received and all moneys disbursed out of the fund.

(d) All moneys in excess of $1,000,000
remaining on balance in the public utilities commission special fund on
June 30 of each year shall lapse to the credit of the state general fund. [L
1994, c 226, §1; am L 1998, c 11, §17; am L 1999, c 129, §6; am L 2004, c 141,
§§3, 7; am L 2005, c 22, §51; am L 2009, c 72, §3; am L 2013, c 24, §2; am L
2014, c 108, §7]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next